Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 49. Nuclear Waste Storage and Disposal
§ 57-49-41.
Assistance from other state agencies.

The board shall rely on the expertise of staff in other state agencies to assist the board in its duties whenever possible and these other state agencies shall assist the board as much as possible in fulfilling its duties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 474, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1982).

§ 57-49-43.
Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted by the federal government or the federal Department of Energy as an expression by the people of this state to accept the establishment of a site for the long-term or temporary storage and/or permanent disposal of high-level radioactive waste or transuranic waste.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1982, ch. 474, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1982).